Wyoming statutes. Constitution of the State of Wyoming
Article 10. Corporations
§ 5. Acceptance of constitution.

No corporation organized under the laws of Wyoming Territory or any other jurisdiction than this state, shall be permitted to transact business in this state until it shall have accepted the constitution of this state and filed such acceptance in accordance with the laws thereof.

Provisions hereof are mandatory,

so that an action cannot be prosecuted where noncompliance with the provision hereof is raised. Gould Land & Cattle Co. v. Rocky Mountain Bell Tel. Co., 17 Wyo. 507, 101 P. 939,

1909 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(Wyo. 1909).

Territorial corporations. —

Corporations created by territory of Wyoming must be considered as corporations of the state to same extent as if they derived their corporate existence directly from state. Drew v. Beckwith, Quinn & Co., 57 Wyo. 140, 114 P.2d 98,

1941 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 57 Wyo. 140, 115 P.2d 651,

1941 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1941).

National bank need not file an acceptance

of the constitution before transacting business in this state, although its principal place of business may be located in another state. State ex rel. Eaton v. Hirst, 53 Wyo. 163, 79 P.2d 489,

1938 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 1938).

Transacting business in state. —

Bona fide offer by foreign corporation to sell property represented by mining claim would not constitute transacting business in Wyoming in violation of fundamental and statutory law. Chittim v. Belle Fourche Bentonite Products Co., 60 Wyo. 235, 149 P.2d 142,

1944 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1944).

Foreign corporation which did not meet legal requirements for doing business within state but took mining claim conveyance, did assessment work thereon and endeavored to sell it, was not transacting business within prohibition in constitution and statutes. Chittim v. Belle Fourche Bentonite Products Co., 60 Wyo. 235, 149 P.2d 142,

1944 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1944).

Construction of a canal in the state by a foreign corporation, covering a period of several months and involving many miscellaneous matters of business transacted, was not a single transaction so as not to constitute doing business in the state. Interstate Constr. Co. v. Lakeview Canal Co., 31 Wyo. 191, 224 P. 850,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1924).

A foreign corporation, shipping in refrigerator equipment from another state, under agreement to install same, was not doing business in the state so as to preclude it from repossessing it upon default of purchaser, but was engaged in interstate commerce notwithstanding use of local labor and supplies in installation, unless such was of a magnitude not merely incidental to original interstate commerce transaction. Creamery Package Mfg. Co. v. Cheyenne Ice Cream Co., 55 Wyo. 277, 100 P.2d 116,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 1940).

Domestication of corporation. —

Fact that foreign corporation plaintiff domesticated itself after having commenced and dismissed one replevin action is not of importance to preclude recovery, in a second suit, especially concerning an interstate transaction. Creamery Package Mfg. Co. v. Cheyenne Ice Cream Co., 55 Wyo. 277, 100 P.2d 116,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 1940).

Quoted

in

United Pac. Ins. Co. v. Martin & Luther Gen. Contractors, 455 P.2d 664,

1969 Wyo. LEXIS 142

(Wyo. 1969).

Stated

in

True v. Hi-Plains Elevator Mach., Inc., 577 P.2d 991,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 281

(Wyo. 1978).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Wyoming Eminent Domain Act: Comment on the Act and Rule 71.1 of the Wyoming Rules of Civil Procedure,” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 739 (1983).

For article, “The New Wyoming Business Corporation Act and Close Corporation Supplement,” see XXV Land & Water L. Rev. 527 (1990).

§ 6. Engaging in more than one line of business.

Corporations shall have power to engage in such and as many lines or departments of business as the legislature shall provide. (As amended by Laws 1959, Senate Joint Resolution No. 3, p. 350.)

Territorial corporations. —

Corporations created by territory of Wyoming must be considered as corporations of the state to same extent as if they derived their corporate existence directly from state. Drew v. Beckwith, Quinn & Co., 57 Wyo. 140, 114 P.2d 98,

1941 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 57 Wyo. 140, 115 P.2d 651,

1941 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1941).

§ 7. What corporations are common carriers.

All corporations engaged in the transportation of persons, property, mineral oils, and minerals products, news or intelligence, including railroads, telegraphs, express companies, pipe lines and telephones, are declared to be common carriers.

All public utilities in Wyoming are deemed common carriers.

Continental Pipe Line Co. v. Belle Fourche Pipeline Co., 372 F. Supp. 1333, 1974 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 9294 (D. Wyo. 1974).

Motor carriers may be common carriers,

although automobiles were unknown at the time of the adoption of the constitution. Application of Union Pac. Motor Freight Co., 72 Wyo. 298, 264 P.2d 771,

1953 Wyo. LEXIS 46

(Wyo. 1953).

“Carriers” construed. —

Under Selective Sales Tax Act of 1937, imposing a tax equivalent to two percent on the amount paid to carriers for transportation service, a company carrying its own oil in its own pipe lines, and none for others, is not a “carrier,” is not within this section of the constitution, and is not taxable. State Bd. of Equalization v. Stanolind Oil & Gas Co., 54 Wyo. 521, 94 P.2d 147,

1939 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Wyo. 1939).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Application of res ipsa loquitur doctrine to accidents incurred by passenger while boarding or alighting from a carrier, 93 ALR3d 776.

State regulation of radio paging services, 44 ALR4th 216.

§ 8. Trusts prohibited.

There shall be no consolidation or combination of corporations of any kind whatever to prevent competition, to control or influence productions or prices thereof, or in any other manner to interfere with the public good and general welfare.

Cross references. —

For provision prohibiting monopolies, see art. 1, § 30, Wyo. Const.

For other provisions concerning monopolies, discriminations in trade, etc., see §§

40-4-101

to

40-4-123

.

Wording of this provision is uncertain.

Bulova Watch Co. v. Zale Jewelry Co., 371 P.2d 409,

1962 Wyo. LEXIS 85

(Wyo. 1962).

But some restriction on controlling prices was intended. —

It seems plain that the constitutional framers sought some restriction on corporations controlling or influencing prices. Bulova Watch Co. v. Zale Jewelry Co., 371 P.2d 409,

1962 Wyo. LEXIS 85

(Wyo. 1962).

§ 9. Eminent domain.

The right of eminent domain shall never be so abridged or construed as to prevent the legislature from taking property and franchises of incorporated companies and subjecting them to public use the same as the property of individuals.

Cross references. —

For other provisions relative to eminent domain, see art. 1, § 32, and art. 10, § 14, Wyo. Const. See also chapter 26 of title 1.

§ 10. Mutual and co-operative associations.

The legislature shall provide by suitable legislation for the organization of mutual and co-operative associations or corporations.

Cross references. —

For provisions concerning cooperative marketing associations, see §§

17-10-101

to

17-10-126

.

Railroad and Telegraph Lines

§ 11. Powers and rights of railroads.

Any railroad corporation or association organized for the purpose, shall have the right to construct and operate a railroad between any points within this state and to connect at the state line with railroads of other states. Every railroad shall have the right with its road to intersect, connect with or cross any other railroad, and all railroads shall receive and transport each other's passengers, and tonnage and cars, loaded or empty, without delay or discrimination.

Cross references. —

As to railroads generally, see §§

37-9-101

to

37-9-802

.

Law reviews. —

For article, “State Jurisdiction over the Regulation of Energy Distribution and Other Public Utility Services,” see XV Land & Water L. Rev. 535 (1980).

§ 12. Discrimination by railroads and telegraph lines forbidden.

Railroad and telegraph lines heretofore constructed or that may hereafter be constructed in this state are hereby declared public highways and common carriers, and as such must be made by law to extend the same equality and impartiality to all who use them, excepting employees and their families and ministers of the gospel, whether individuals or corporations.

Cross references. —

For provision prohibiting monopolies, see art. 1, § 30, Wyo. Const.

For other provisions as to discrimination in rates, see §§

40-4-101

to

40-4-123

.

§ 13. Railroads to make annual reports to state auditor.

Every railroad corporation or association operating a line of railroad within this state shall annually make a report to the auditor of state of its business within this state, in such form as the legislature may prescribe.

§ 14. Eminent domain.

Exercise of the power and right of eminent domain shall never be so construed or abridged as to prevent the taking by the legislature of property and franchises of incorporated companies and subjecting them to public use the same as property of individuals.

Cross references. —

For identical provision, see § 9 of this article.

As to eminent domain in connection with railroads, see §§

1-26-810

,

1-26-811

.

§ 15. Aid to railroads and telegraph lines prohibited.

Neither the state, nor any county, township, school district or municipality shall loan or give its credit or make donations to or in aid of any railroad or telegraph line; provided, that this section shall not apply to obligations of any county, city, township or school district, contracted prior to the adoption of this constitution.

Cross references. —

For another provision prohibiting aid to railroads, see art. 3, § 39, Wyo. Const.

§ 16. Acceptance of constitution by existing railroad, transportation and telegraph companies.

No railroad or other transportation company or telegraph company in existence upon the adoption of this constitution shall derive the benefit of any future legislation without first filing in the office of the secretary of state an acceptance of the provisions of this constitution.

Territorial corporations. —

Provision of statute permitting any corporation organized under any law of the state to prolong its existence in the manner therein stated is available to corporations organized while Wyoming was a territory. Drew v. Beckwith, Quinn & Co., 57 Wyo. 140, 114 P.2d 98,

1941 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 57 Wyo. 140, 115 P.2d 651,

1941 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1941).

§ 17. Rights of telegraph companies.

Any association, corporation or lessee of the franchises thereof organized for the purpose shall have the right to construct and maintain lines of telegraph within this state, and to connect the same with other lines.

Cross references. —

As to eminent domain in connection with utilities, see §§

1-26-813

to

1-26-816

.

§ 18. Foreign railroad or telegraph company must have agent for service of process.

No foreign railroad or telegraph line shall do any business within this state without having an agent or agents within each county through which such railroad or telegraph line shall be constructed upon whom process may be served.

Cross references. —

For provisions concerning service of process, see chapter 6 of title 1 and Rule 4, W.R.C.P.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Service of process by mail in international civil action as permissible under Hague Convention, 112 ALR Fed 241.

§ 19. Location of depots.

No railroad company shall construct or operate a railroad within four (4) miles of any existing town or city without providing a suitable depot or stopping place at the nearest practicable point for the convenience of said town or city, and stopping all trains doing local business at said stopping place. No railroad company shall deviate from the most direct practicable line in constructing a railroad for the purpose of avoiding the provisions of this section.

Cross references. —

For other provisions concerning location of depots, see §§

37-9-401

to

37-9-410

.

Editor's notes. —

In the original constitution the sections under the heading “Railroads” were numbered 1 to 9, but to avoid confusion in making references these sections were renumbered 11 to 19 so as to make the section numbers of this article run consecutively.